Odia_apertium_morph_dict.dix
<pardef n="k/ah__v">
<e><p><l>ahe</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uhe</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahu</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahu</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uha</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>uha</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahanwi</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uhe</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahe</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahanwi</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uhanwi</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uhanwi</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahanwi</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahuCi</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>ahuCu</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahuCu</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahuCa</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahuCa</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahuCi</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahuCanwi</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahuCanwi</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahiCi</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>ahiCu</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahiCu</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahiCa</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>ahiCa</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahiCanwi</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahiCi</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahiCanwi</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahiCanwi</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahili</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahilu</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahilu</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahila</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahila</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahile</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahilA</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahile</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahile</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahuWili</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahuWilu</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahuWilu</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahuWulu</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahuWila</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahuWila</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahuWile</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahuWilA</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahuWile</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahuWile</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>ahiWili</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahiWilu</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahiWilu</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahiWila</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahiWila</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahiWile</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahiWilA</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahiWile</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahiWile</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahibi</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahibu</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahibu</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahiba</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahiba</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahibe</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahiba</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahibe</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahibe</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>ahuWibi</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahuWibu</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahuWibu</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ahuWiba</l><r>ah<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="kah"><i>k</i><par n="k/ah__v"/></e>
<e lm="rah"><i>r</i><par n="k/ah__v"/></e>
